Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-247
Wildlife, defined.

Wildlife means any member of any nondomesticated species of the animal kingdom, whether reared in captivity or not, including any mammal, fish, bird, amphibian, reptile, mollusk, crustacean, arthropod, or other invertebrate and includes any part, product, egg, or offspring thereof or the dead body or parts thereof.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 57.